Arkansas, session 2025, SB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-16-706, concerning the contents of the
written test to obtain a driver's license, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(6) Hand signals used by an operator of a bicycle to communicate
turning, slowing, and stopping.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-18-108, concerning the contents of the
driver's instruction manual issued to a person who is preparing to take a
driver's license examination, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
*ZRC067*
02/26/2025 2:34:51 PM ZRC067

SB330
read as follows:
(6) The hand signals used by an operator of a bicycle to
communicate turning, slowing, and stopping.

































02/26/2025 2:34:51 PM ZRC067